North Carolina, session 2025, SB75.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 6.2 of the Charter of the Town of Garner, being Chapter 333
of the Session Laws of 1977, as amended, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 6.2. Settlement of claims. (a) The board of aldermen town council may authorize the
town manager to settle the following claims against the town for personal town:
(1) Personal injury or damage to property when the amount involved does not
exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00) ten thousand dollars
($10,000) and does not exceed the actual loss sustained, including loss of time,
medical expenses, and any other expense actually incurred.
(2) Eminent domain cases filed by the town when the amount involved does not
exceed the amount budgeted for property or easement acquisition for the
approved capital improvement program.
(3) Claims made by the town or debts owed to the town when the amount involved
does not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(b) All such settlements shall be approved by the town attorney.attorney and reported to the
town council in a timely manner. Settlement of a claim by the town manager pursuant to this
section shall constitute a complete release of the town from any and all damages sustained by the
person involved in such settlement in any manner arising out of the incident, occasion, or taking
complained of."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S75-v-1*